Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1221
Motorboat; number awarded; maintained in legible condition; certificate of number; available for inspection; when removed.

(1) The number awarded or assigned pursuant to section 37-1216 shall be maintained in legible condition. The certificate of number shall be pocket size and shall be available at all times for inspection on the vessel for which issued, whenever such vessel is in operation.

(2) The person whose name appears on a certificate of number as an owner of a vessel shall remove the number and identification symbol when (a) the vessel is documented by the United States Coast Guard, (b) the certificate of number was obtained by false statement, (c) the fees for issuance of a number are not paid, or (d) the vessel is no longer principally used in the state where the certificate was issued.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 21.